Utah statutes.
41-6a-1109.   Bicycles and mopeds -- Turn signals -- Exceptions.

(1)  Except as provided in this section, a person riding a bicycle or moped shall comply with Section 41-6a-804 regarding turn signals and turning.

(2) A person is not required to signal by hand and arm continuously if the hand is needed in the control or operation of the bicycle or moped.

(3)  A person operating a bicycle or moped who is stopped in a lane designated for turning traffic only is not required to signal prior to making the turning movement.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

